Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2619
Optometry; patient's freedom of choice.

No agencies of the state or its subdivisions administering relief, public assistance, public welfare assistance, or other health service under the laws of this state, including the public schools, shall in the performance of their duties, interfere with any patient's freedom of choice in the selection of practitioners licensed to perform examinations and provide treatment within the field for which their respective licenses entitle them to practice.

Laws 1967, c. 431, § 1, p. 1319;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.04;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 892.

Provisions for insuring cost of service of optometrist, see section 44-513.